src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: staður
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: stað
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [stað, staði]
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: staðar
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: staðir
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: staðir
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: støðum
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: staða
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: staðurin
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: staðin
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [staðnum, staðinum]
    staður+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: staðarins
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: staðirnir
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: staðirnar
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: støðunum
    staður+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: staðanna
